tests/copyfrom/stem.sbl
strings (x y z)
integers ( p1 )
routines ( setvars checkit doit )
externals (stem)

define setvars as ( $z = 'ing' $x = 'ingly' $y = z $z checkit)

define checkit as ($p1 = limit)

backwardmode (define doit as ( [x] <- y ))

define stem as (
    setvars
    backwards doit
)
